Louisiana, session 2026, SB325.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 27:27.2 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§27.2. Board designated excluded persons
A. The board shall adopt rules to provide for the establishment of a list of
persons who are to be excluded from any room, premises, or designated gaming area
of any establishment where gaming is conducted pursuant to a license or contract
issued pursuant to the provisions of this Title. The rules shall define the standards for
exclusion and include standards relating to the following persons:
(1) Those who are career or professional offenders as defined by the rules of
the board.
(2) Those who have been convicted of a criminal offense as specified by the
board.
(3)(a) Those whose presence in a gaming establishment operated by a
licensee or the casino operator would be adverse to the interests of Louisiana or
gaming operations. For purposes of this Paragraph, the following persons may be
excluded:
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 325 ENROLLED
(i) Persons suspected of cheating.
(ii) Persons whose gaming privileges, permits, or licenses have been
suspended, revoked, or denied.
(iii) Persons who pose a threat to the safety of the patrons or employees of
the casino operator or casino manager or any casino gaming licensee.
(iv) Persons with a documented history of conduct involving the disruption
of the gaming operations in any jurisdiction.
(v) Persons subject to an order of a Louisiana court excluding such persons
from any gaming establishment.
(vi) Persons with pending charges for a gaming or gambling crime or a crime
related to the integrity of gaming operations.
(b) A person may not be excluded from a gaming establishment operated by
a licensee or the casino operator for reasons based solely on the skill level of the
person.
B. The board shall adopt rules to provide for the establishment of a list
of persons who are to be excluded from or ejected from a retail sports book and
from participating in the play or operation of mobile wagering pursuant to a
license or contract issued pursuant to the provisions of this Title. The rules shall
define the standards for exclusion or ejection and include standards relating to
the following persons:
(1) Those persons excluded as provided in Subsection A of this Section.
(2) Those persons who, before, during, or after a sporting event, threaten
violence or harm against any person who is involved in the sporting event,
where the threat is related to sports gaming.
(3) Those persons whose presence in a retail sports book or whose
participation in the play or operation of mobile wagering in this state is
determined by the board to pose a threat to the interests of the state, to
achieving the intents and purposes of this Title, or to the strict and effective
regulation of sports wagering.
C. The board and the division shall have the authority to place persons on the
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 325 ENROLLED
excluded list. The board or division may not place a person on the list required by
this Section due to the person's race, color, creed, national origin, sex, or disability,
as defined in R.S. 51:2232.
C.D. Whenever the name and description of any person is placed on an
excluded person's list pursuant to this Title, except at that person's request, the
division shall serve notice of such fact to such person by either of the following:
(1) By personal service.
(2) By certified mail to the last known address of such person.
D.E. A person may petition the board for removal of his name from the list.
The petitioner has the burden of proving he does not meet the criteria of Paragraph
(A)(1), (2), or (3) Subsection A of this Section.
E.F. Any person who has been placed on the list of persons to be excluded
or ejected from any gaming establishment pursuant to this Title may be imprisoned
for up to six months or fined not more than five hundred dollars, or both if he
thereafter enters or attempts to enter the premises of a gaming establishment without
first having obtained a determination by the board that he should not have been
placed on the list of persons to be excluded or ejected.
F.G. (1) The board may impose sanctions on a licensee, permittee, or casino
gaming operator under this Title, if the licensee, permittee, or casino gaming
operator willfully fails to exclude from the licensed gaming establishment a person
placed on the exclusion list.
(2) The board may seek revocation or suspension of a license, permit, or
casino operating contract if the licensee, permittee, or casino gaming operator
engages in a pattern of willful failure to exclude from the licensed gaming
establishment persons placed on the exclusion list.
G.H.(1) A person who is placed on the list is entitled to a hearing for review
of the listing, unless otherwise agreed by the board or division and the named person,
the hearing shall be held by the hearing officer in accordance with R.S. 27:25 not
later than thirty days after the receipt of the petition.
(2) If upon completion of the hearing, the hearing officer determines that the
Page 3 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 325 ENROLLED
rule does not or should not apply to the person listed, the division shall notify all
licensees, casino gaming operator, and permittees of the determination.
H.I. The provisions of this Section shall not apply to persons licensed
pursuant to the provisions of the Video Draw Poker Devices Control Law as
provided in Chapter 8 of this Title.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.